California statutes. Food and Agricultural Code
This article shall become inoperative as of March 1, 2026, unless the secretary finds, in a referendum conducted by the secretary, or a person designated by the secretary, subsequent to the operative date of the amendments to this section adopted in 2024, that a favorable vote has been given pursuant to this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 197, Sec. 3.   (AB 1861)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Repealed as of March 1, 2031, pursuant to Section 6047.19.    Note: Except for Sections 6047.19 and 6047.29, the inoperation clause in this section applies to Article 8.5, comprising Sections 6047.1 to 6047.30.)
-------------------------------------------

6047.21.

(a) No later than April 15, 2025, the secretary shall establish a list of those persons eligible to vote on the continued implementation of this article.

(b) Eligibility shall be limited to the producers, processors, and persons who paid the assessment on grapes crushed in the immediately preceding season.

(c) (1) In establishing the list, the secretary may require processors, producers, and others to submit the names, mailing addresses, and assessment values of all producers who paid
 the assessment on grapes crushed in the immediately preceding marketing season.

(2) The information required by the secretary shall be filed either with the annual assessment report or no later than 30 days following receipt of a written notice from the secretary requesting the information.

(d) Any producer whose name does not appear on the secretary’s list may have their name added to the list by filing with the secretary a signed statement identifying them as a producer that paid an assessment during the most recent marketing season.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 197, Sec. 4.   (AB 1861)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Conditionally inoperative on March 1, 2026, as provided in Sections 6047.20 and 6047.27.    Repealed as of March 1, 2031, pursuant to Section 6047.19.)
-------------------------------------------

6047.22.

For the purpose of voting in the referendum required in Section 6047.20, only a person required to pay the assessment pursuant to Section 6047.8 shall have the right to vote.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 485, Sec. 11.   Effective September 10, 2004.   Conditionally inoperative on March 1, 2026, as provided in Sections 6047.20 and 6047.27.   Repealed as of March 1, 2031, pursuant to Section 6047.19.)
-------------------------------------------

6047.23.

In determining whether this article shall become inoperative, the secretary shall find that at least 40 percent of the total number of persons from the list established by the secretary participated in the referendum, and that either one of the following occurred:

(a) 65 percent or more of the persons who voted in the referendum voted in favor of this article, and the persons who voted paid a majority of the assessment dollars on grapes in the preceding marketing season that were paid by all the persons who voted in the referendum.

(b) A majority of the persons who voted in the referendum voted in favor of this article, and the persons who voted paid 65 percent or more of the assessment dollars on grapes in the preceding marketing season that were paid by all the persons who voted in the referendum.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 485, Sec. 12.   Effective September 10, 2004.   Conditionally inoperative on March 1, 2026, as provided in Sections 6047.20 and 6047.27.   Repealed as of March 1, 2031, pursuant to Section 6047.19.)
-------------------------------------------

6047.24.

In determining whether the referendum is approved by producers pursuant to the provisions of this article, the secretary shall consider the vote in favor of the referendum of any nonprofit agricultural cooperative marketing association, which is authorized by its members so to assent, as being the assent, approval, or favor of the producers that are members of, or stockholders in, that nonprofit agricultural cooperative marketing association.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 485, Sec. 13.   Effective September 10, 2004.   Conditionally inoperative on March 1, 2026, as provided in Sections 6047.20 and 6047.27.   Repealed as of March 1, 2031, pursuant to Section 6047.19.)
-------------------------------------------

6047.25.

The secretary shall establish a period in which to conduct the referendum that shall not be less than 10 days nor more than 60 days in duration. The secretary may prescribe additional procedures to conduct the referendum. If the initial period established is less than 60 days, the secretary may extend the period. However, the total referendum period may not exceed 60 days.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 485, Sec. 13.5.   Effective September 10, 2004.   Conditionally inoperative on March 1, 2026, as provided in Sections 6047.20 and 6047.27.   Repealed as of March 1, 2031, pursuant to Section 6047.19.)
-------------------------------------------

6047.26.

Nonreceipt of a ballot shall not invalidate a referendum.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 485, Sec. 14.   Effective September 10, 2004.   Conditionally inoperative on March 1, 2026, as provided in Sections 6047.20 and 6047.27.   Repealed as of March 1, 2031, pursuant to Section 6047.19.)
-------------------------------------------

6047.27.

(a) If the secretary finds that a favorable vote as provided in this article has not been given subsequent to the operative date of the amendments to this section adopted in 2024, this article shall become inoperative as of March 1, 2026.

(b) If the secretary finds that a favorable vote has been given as provided in this article, the secretary shall certify and give notice of
 the favorable vote to all persons whose names and addresses may be on file with the secretary as provided in Section 6047.21.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 197, Sec. 5.   (AB 1861)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Repealed as of March 1, 2031, pursuant to Section 6047.19.    Note: Except for Sections 6047.19 and 6047.29, the inoperation clause in subd. (a) applies to Article 8.5, comprising Sections 6047.1 to 6047.30.)
-------------------------------------------

6047.28.

(a) The provisions of this article are severable.

(b) If any provision of this section or its application is held invalid, that invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 485, Sec. 16.   Effective September 10, 2004.   Conditionally inoperative on March 1, 2026, as provided in Sections 6047.20 and 6047.27.   Repealed as of March 1, 2031, pursuant to Section 6047.19.)
-------------------------------------------

6047.29.

(a) The secretary shall appoint an advisory task force consisting of scientific experts, including, but not limited to, university researchers and agricultural representatives, for the purpose of advising the secretary on the control and management of Pierce’s disease.

(b) Members of the advisory task force, or alternate members when acting as members, may be reimbursed, upon request, for necessary expenses incurred by them in the performance of their duties.

(c) Notwithstanding Sections 6047.20 and 6047.27, this section shall remain in effect until March 1,
 2031, and as of that date is repealed, unless a later enacted statute, that is enacted before March 1, 2031, deletes or extends that date.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 197, Sec. 6.   (AB 1861)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Repealed as of March 1, 2031, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

6047.30.

(a) The board may, after consulting with the advisory task force and upon making findings as described in this section, recommend to the secretary, and the secretary may determine, that a pest or disease affecting grapes grown in California and crushed for wine, wine vinegar, juice, concentrate, or beverage brandy be designated as an other designated pest or disease, and that money should be expended on research and outreach programs for purposes consistent with Sections 6046 and 6047.1 relating to the other designated pest or disease. However, no General Fund moneys shall be expended after March 1, 2011, on new research and outreach programs relating to other designated pests or diseases.

(b) The board’s findings in support of a recommendation under this section shall include all of the
 following:

(1) The pest or disease would adversely affect the health of grape vines, the yield from grape vines, or the quality of grapes grown on the vines if the pest or disease becomes established in California or expands to new areas of the state.

(2) The pest or disease would significantly damage the state’s agricultural business economy if allowed to become established in California or expand to new areas of the state.

(3) Significant portions of the grape producing areas of the state are now affected, or reasonably likely to be adversely affected in the future, by the spread of the pest or disease.

(4) Expenditures of money approved by the secretary based on the findings and recommendations described in this section will not, to a substantial degree, diminish any expenditures under Article 8 (commencing with Section 6045) or this
 article on Pierce’s disease and its vectors, particularly the glassy-winged sharpshooter, research, work plans, and program activities.

(5) Scientific experts, including, but not limited to, university researchers, entomologists, plant pathologists, economists, and other agricultural representatives have provided information and advice in support of the findings described in paragraphs (1), (2), (3), and (4). For purposes of this paragraph, it is not required that all scientific experts consulted by the board agree or provide similar advice.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 325, Sec. 11.   (SB 2)   Effective January 1, 2010.   Conditionally inoperative on March 1, 2026, as provided in Sections 6047.20 and 6047.27.   Repealed as of March 1, 2031, pursuant to Section 6047.19.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8.7. Table Grape Pest and Disease District [6047.60. - 6047.124.]

6047.60.

The Legislature hereby finds and declares the following:

(a) California is the leading producer of table grapes in the United States, accounting for 97 percent of table grapes grown in this country.

(b) Table grapes are grown in 15 counties located throughout the state.

(c) California grows more than 170,000 acres of table grapes producing over 700,000 tons of table grapes per year, valued at more than eight hundred sixty million dollars ($860,000,000) with a direct and indirect impact on the state’s economy that totals more than four billion dollars ($4,000,000,000).

(d) The plant killing bacterium, Xylella fastidiosa, and the resulting plant disease known as Pierce’s disease, and its vectors, present a clear and present danger to California’s nearly three billion dollar ($3,000,000,000) grape industry, as well as to many other commodities and plant life.

(e) Pierce’s disease and its vector the glassy-winged sharpshooter have spread into the southern San Joaquin Valley, which, if left unabated, places grapes and other commodities throughout California in immediate peril.

(f) In addition to the research funds and program provisions set forth in Article 8 (commencing with Section 6045) of Chapter 9 of Part 1 of Division 4, dealing with wine grapes, the table grape industry is at substantial risk for Pierce’s disease and other pests and recognizes the need for additional specific control programs.

(g) Additional programs may include field treatments similar to, or the expansion of, the successful United States Department of Agriculture and California Department of Food and Agriculture General Beale area pilot program in Kern County. The expansion of those programs may require industry assessments from the table grape industry through the creation of a pest abatement district.

(h) The state has an interest in protecting its agricultural products from further destruction by the glassy-winged sharpshooter and Pierce’s disease, and other designated pests and diseases.

(i) As a known vector for Pierce’s disease, the glassy-winged sharpshooter has been determined to carry and spread Pierce’s disease to many forms of California agriculture, usually with complete destruction to the infected crop. This destructive effect of the disease has been determined by experts in the viticulture field to be especially true with respect to infected table grapes. To avoid a potentially catastrophic loss to one of California’s most important industries, the Legislature declares that this article is in the interest of the public health and welfare.

(j) This article shall not establish a precedent for, or supercede, reduce, or in any way alter, government funding from any source related to Pierce’s disease and other designated pests and diseases in this state.

(k) The Legislature further declares that it is in the interest of the public health and welfare that the districts authorized to be created by this article not duplicate existing services already being provided by the University of California, state, counties, or the county agricultural commissioners to eradicate the glassy-winged sharpshooter and Pierce’s disease, and other designated pests and diseases.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 400, Sec. 1.5.   Effective September 9, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

6047.61.

This article shall be known and may be cited as the Table Grape Pest and Disease District Law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 400, Sec. 2.   Effective September 9, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

6047.62.

(a) It is the purpose of this article to make available a procedure for the organization, operation, and dissolution of districts to respond to the effects of the spread of the glassy-winged sharpshooter and Pierce’s disease, and other designated pests and diseases that attack table grape plants, and to collect and disseminate to table grape producers in the district all relevant information and scientific studies concerning the pest or pests, as well as to chart and determine the extent and location of any infestations.

(b) Division 3 (commencing with Section 56000) of Title 5 of the Government Code does not apply to districts organized pursuant to this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 400, Sec. 2.5.   Effective September 9, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

6047.63.

Unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions in this section govern the construction of this article.

(a) “Board” or “board of directors” means the board of directors of a district.

(b) “District” means a table grape pest district organized pursuant to this article.

(c) “Owner” includes joint owner, coowner, guardian, executor, administrator, or any other person that holds property in a trust capacity under court appointment.

(d) “Pierce’s disease” is the disease of grapevines caused by the bacterium Xylella fastidiosa.

(e) “Table grapes” means all table grape varieties specified in the report issued pursuant to Section 55601.5. “Table grapes” also means all raisin varieties specified in the report issued pursuant to Section 55601.5 that are intended to be marketed in their fresh form.

(f) “Table grape acreage” means any parcel of real property with more than one acre of table grape plants.

(g) “Grower” or “producer” means any person who is engaged within this state in the business of producing, or causing to be produced, table grapes for market.

(h) “Other designated pests and diseases” means pests and diseases designated by the district as serious pests and diseases warranting district action.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 400, Sec. 3.   Effective September 9, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

6047.64.

(a) Proceedings for the formation of a district within any county shall be commenced by a petition signed by the owners of 15 percent of the table grape acreage.

(b) The petition shall be addressed to, and filed with, the board of supervisors of the county.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 400, Sec. 4.   Effective September 9, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

6047.65.

The petition may be filed in sections, each of which shall comply with all the requirements for a petition, except that a section need not contain the total number of signatures required for the petition.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 244, Sec. 1.   Effective August 29, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

6047.66.

Signatures to the petition may be withdrawn at any time before it has been acted upon by filing with the clerk of the board of supervisors a declaration signed by the petitioner that states that it is the intention of the petitioner to withdraw his or her signature from the petition.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 244, Sec. 1.   Effective August 29, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

6047.67.

(a) The petition shall state the name of the proposed district and shall set forth its boundaries or describe the lands to be included.

(b) It is a sufficient designation of the boundaries of a proposed district to recite that all the table grape acreage in the county that is to be included in the district, or that all the table grape acreage in a designated area within the county is to be included in the district.

(c) If either designation is used, the outside boundary of the area designated is the boundary of the district, and the district shall include all areas within the outside boundary.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 244, Sec. 1.   Effective August 29, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

6047.68.

(a) The petition shall be accompanied by a fee in an amount established by the board of supervisors as is necessary to reimburse the county for all costs incurred by it in connection with the proposed organization of the district. The board of supervisors may charge the district for actual expenses incurred by the county in connection with the proceedings for the formation of the district.

(b) Upon the establishment of the district, the district shall reimburse those who provided the funds specified in subdivision (a) from assessments collected pursuant to this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 12, Sec. 4.   Effective June 9, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

6047.69.

(a) Upon the presentation and filing of a petition, the board of supervisors shall refer the petition to the county agricultural commissioner for the preparation of a register of owners of table grape acreage within the proposed district, and for an investigation and report.

(b) The county agricultural commissioner shall create a register of all table grape acreage owners within the proposed district and specifically describe the net acreage of land devoted to the growing of table grapes by each owner. The county agricultural commissioner shall file with the register of table grape acreage owners a report to the board of supervisors describing the present condition of the glassy-winged sharpshooter and Pierce’s disease infestations, or infestation of other designated pests and diseases, and any proposed program that may warrant the board of supervisors proceeding with the organization of the district and recommendation as to the advisability of creating the district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 400, Sec. 6.   Effective September 9, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

6047.70.

(a) The board of supervisors shall fix a time and place for a hearing of the petition.

(b) The hearing shall not be less than 20 days, or more than 40 days, after the filing of the petition with the board of supervisors.

(c) The board of supervisors shall order the clerk of the board of supervisors to give notice of the hearing that will do the following:

(1) State the time and place for the hearing that was fixed by the board of supervisors.

(2) State that at the hearing protests will be considered by the board of supervisors.

(3) State that requests in writing for the exclusion of acreage from, or the inclusion of acreage in, the proposed district, will be heard and considered by the board of supervisors.

(4) State that the petition is available for inspection at the office of the clerk of the board of supervisors.

(5) Designate the boundaries of the proposed district in substantially the same way that they are described in the petition.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 400, Sec. 7.   Effective September 9, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

6047.71.

Notice of the hearing shall be given by publication in a newspaper of general circulation published and circulated in the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 244, Sec. 1.   Effective August 29, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

6047.72.

The notice shall be published once a week for two successive weeks prior to the date set for the hearing.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 244, Sec. 1.   Effective August 29, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

6047.73.

At the hearing, the report of the county agricultural commissioner shall be received. Protests may be made orally or in writing by any person interested in the formation of the proposed district. Any protest that pertains to the regularity or sufficiency of the proceedings shall be in writing and shall clearly set forth the defects to which objection is made. All written protests shall be filed with the clerk of the board of supervisors on or before the time fixed for the final hearing. The hearing may be continued from time to time, not to exceed 60 days.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 244, Sec. 1.   Effective August 29, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

6047.74.

At the hearing, any owner of table grape acreage in the proposed district may present to the board of supervisors a request, in writing, for the exclusion of that acreage or any part of that acreage from the proposed district upon a showing that the acreage or part of that acreage will not be benefited by the activities of the proposed district. However, if the excluded acreage is planted with table grapes, the owner of the acreage shall inform the district, in writing, within 30 days of planting. Factors that the board of supervisors may consider in its determination for exclusion, as set forth in an affidavit from the owner of the acreage, shall include the following:

(a) That the acreage is not planted to table grapes and will not be so planted in the foreseeable future, as evidenced by an affidavit from the owner of the acreage so stating.

(b) That the table grape plants have been removed from the acreage and that no living table grape plants remain on the acreage.

(c) That exclusion of the acreage, or any part of the acreage, from the district will not present a risk of glassy-winged sharpshooter infestation or infestation by other designated pests or diseases because of the acreage’s distance or isolation from infested geographical regions.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 400, Sec. 8.   Effective September 9, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

6047.75.

If the board of supervisors determines that the petition does not comply with the requirements of law, the matter may be dismissed without prejudice to present a new petition covering the same matter. A finding by the board of supervisors in favor of the sufficiency of the petition and notice is final and conclusive against all persons except the state in a proceeding brought by the Attorney General within one year of the date of the making of the order establishing and describing the boundaries of the district. If the petition is dismissed, that portion of the fee imposed under Section 6047.68 that would have been used to pay for costs of the election shall be refunded.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 244, Sec. 1.   Effective August 29, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

6047.76.

(a) If the board of supervisors determines that the project is feasible and in the interest of the table grape acreage owners of the county, the board of supervisors shall, by order entered in its minutes, declare the district is duly organized under the name designated in the petition for the formation of the district.

(b) The order shall describe the territory included in the district and, if the board of supervisors does not exclude or include acreage pursuant to Section 6047.78, it is a sufficient description of the territory to describe the boundaries in substantially the same way as they are described in the petition.

(c) A copy of the order certified by the clerk of the board of supervisors shall be filed with the county recorder of the county in which the district is situated.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 400, Sec. 9.   Effective September 9, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

6047.78.

(a) In determining the boundaries of the district, the board of supervisors shall exclude from the district any table grape acreage that it finds will not be benefited by the proposed project, pursuant to the facts in Section 6047.74, and it may include in the district any acreage that it finds will be benefited if it also finds it will be in the interest of the district to include this acreage. The inclusion may be upon application of the owner or, without the owner’s application, upon giving the owner notice of the proposed inclusion and an opportunity for a hearing on the inclusion.

(b) Notice of inclusion shall be mailed, postage prepaid, by the clerk of the board of supervisors, to the address of the owner of the acreage as shown by the last equalized county assessment roll, and to any person that has filed with the clerk that person’s name and address and description of acreage in which he or she has either a legal or equitable interest. The notice shall describe the acreage proposed to be included, and shall state the time and place at which objections to the inclusion will be heard.

(c) Any owner of table grape acreage outside of the proposed district may present to the board of supervisors a request in writing for inclusion of the acreage in the proposed district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 400, Sec. 10.   Effective September 9, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

6047.79.

Upon the filing of the order of organization, the board of supervisors shall appoint a board of directors of five members to administer the affairs of the district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 400, Sec. 11.   Effective September 9, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

6047.80.

To be a director of the district, a person shall be either an owner of, or the designee of an owner of, acreage included in the district that is devoted, in whole or in part, to the growing of table grapes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 400, Sec. 12.   Effective September 9, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

6047.81.

Upon his or her appointment, each director shall, in the manner provided by law, subscribe the oath of office and file the oath with the county clerk.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 244, Sec. 1.   Effective August 29, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

6047.82.

(a) From and after the filing for record of the order of the board of supervisors declaring the district organized, and the appointment and qualification of its first board of directors, the organization of the district is complete. The district shall operate for a period of five years from the date of its organization, and shall cease to exist after five years unless the district is reauthorized by the board of supervisors.

(b) The board of directors shall hold a public hearing six months prior to termination of its initial organization or last reauthorization to determine whether the conditions of the glassy-winged sharpshooter or Pierce’s disease or other designated pests and diseases warrant the reauthorization of the district for an additional five years.

(c) The notice of hearing shall state the name of the district and that consideration is being given to reauthorizing the district for an additional five years, the boundaries of the district, and the time and place for the hearing. Notice of the hearing shall be given as provided in Sections 6047.71 and 6047.72. The board of directors shall submit the record of the hearing and its recommendation to the board of supervisors within 90 days of the hearing. The board of supervisors shall approve or reject the recommendation. If it rejects the recommendation, the board of supervisors shall return the report accompanied by its reasons for the rejection to the board of directors within 30 days of receipt. The board of directors may thereafter address the reasons for rejection by the board of supervisors and submit an amended report and new recommendations for reauthorization for approval or rejection by the board of supervisors, unless the district has ceased to exist pursuant to subdivision (a).

(d) If the board of supervisors approves the continuation of the district, the board of supervisors shall, by an order entered in its minutes, declare the district duly extended.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 400, Sec. 13.   Effective September 9, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

6047.83.

(a) Immediately after the organization of the district, the directors shall meet and organize as a board and shall elect a chairperson, vice chairperson, and secretary from among their own number.

(b) The chairperson shall call and preside at all meetings of the board, sign all warrants drawn on the county treasurer, and all contracts and other documents, and the minutes of all meetings at which the chairperson is present. In case of the chairperson’s absence from a meeting, the vice chairperson shall act as chairperson pro Tempore. The vice chairperson may sign warrants in place of the chairperson if the chairperson is absent from a meeting or unavailable. The secretary shall give notice of and keep the minutes of all meetings and prepare and have custody of all records and papers, and have custody of the seal of the district. The secretary shall attest all warrants drawn on the county treasury, all contracts and other documents, and shall sign the minutes of all meetings at which he or she is present. The secretary shall prepare the annual reports and any other reports required by the board and shall prepare all notices and all calls for bids.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 244, Sec. 1.   Effective August 29, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

6047.84.

The members of the board shall serve for terms of two years, or for a longer term as determined by the board of supervisors, and until the appointment and qualification of their successors.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 244, Sec. 1.   Effective August 29, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

6047.85.

Upon the expiration of the term of any member of the board, the board of supervisors shall appoint the successor. Vacancies shall be filled by the board of supervisors for the unexpired term.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 244, Sec. 1.   Effective August 29, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

6047.86.

The members of the board shall not receive any compensation for their services, but may be reimbursed for their actual and necessary expenses, when claims for those expenses have been approved by the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 244, Sec. 1.   Effective August 29, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

6047.87.

(a) The district may do all of the following:

(1) Sue and be sued in all actions and proceedings in all courts and tribunals of competent jurisdiction.

(2) Adopt a seal and alter it at pleasure.

(3) Accept contributions, and by grant, purchase, gift, devise, lease, or otherwise, and hold, use and enjoy, and lease, or otherwise dispose of, real and personal property of every kind and description within or without the district necessary to the full and convenient exercise of its powers.

(4) Recommend an assessment to the board of supervisors to be levied on the owners of acreage of table grapes being grown in the district to pay obligations of the district incurred to accomplish the purposes of the district as provided in this article, which may involve funding all or a portion of a Pierce’s disease or glassy-winged sharpshooter program, or program involving other designated pests and diseases.

(5) Make contracts, and employ, except as otherwise provided in this article, all persons, firms, and corporations necessary to carry out the purposes and the powers of the district, and at any salary, wage, or other compensation as the board of directors shall determine.

(6) Respond to the effects of, the spread of glassy-winged sharpshooter and Pierce’s disease, and other designated pests and diseases, and collect and disseminate to table grape growers and the owners of table grapes acreage in the district relevant information and scientific studies concerning these pests or diseases, as well as to chart and determine the extent and location of any infestations.

(7) Take all actions necessary to control, eradicate, remove, or prevent the spread of the glassy-winged sharpshooter or Pierce’s disease, or other designated pests and diseases injurious to table grapes.

(8) With reasonable advance notice in writing to the landowner, as determined by the district, enter into or upon any land included within the boundaries of the district for the purpose of inspecting the grape plants and any other host plants and fruit growing on these lands.

(9) Eradicate, eliminate, remove, or destroy any table grape plants having evidence of Pierce’s disease or other designated pests and diseases.

(10) Coordinate with the county agricultural commissioner as to his or her taking appropriate actions to have any table grape plants growing within the district infested with Pierce’s disease or other designated pests and diseases adjudged a public nuisance, and decreed that the nuisance be abated.

(11) Coordinate district activities with other table grape pest and disease districts established pursuant to this article and Section 6047.3.

(12) Perform any and all acts, either within or outside the district, necessary or proper to fully and completely carry out the purposes for which the district is organized.

(b) The district’s administrative costs shall be limited to 5 percent of the annual assessment revenue.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 400, Sec. 14.   Effective September 9, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

6047.88.

Every district formed pursuant to this article has all of the powers prescribed by Section 6047.87 and other provisions of this article, regardless of any language in the petition for formation for any district or in any of the proceedings leading to the formation that would otherwise limit the power of the district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 400, Sec. 15.   Effective September 9, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

6047.89.

The county agricultural commissioner of the county in which the district is located shall, upon request of the board, assist the district to the extent possible in all activities undertaken by the district for the control of glassy-winged sharpshooter and Pierce’s disease or other designated pests and diseases.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 400, Sec. 16.   Effective September 9, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

6047.90.

The board shall, immediately after its appointment and after public hearing, formulate an effective plan and adopt a budget of expenditures for the forthcoming fiscal year. At a public hearing on the plan and the budget, any owner of table grape acreage included in the district may make written or oral protest against the budget or any item in it. The plan and the budget, as thereafter approved by the board, shall be the plan and the budget of the district for the forthcoming fiscal year.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 244, Sec. 1.   Effective August 29, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

6047.91.

There may be added to the budget for the first fiscal year of the operation of the district an amount not to exceed 20 percent of the total amount of the budget to cover the preliminary expenses of the district, including, but not limited to, the costs of formation, before the beginning of the first fiscal year.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 244, Sec. 1.   Effective August 29, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

6047.92.

For each fiscal year subsequent to the first year of operation of the district, the board shall adopt the final budget in the same manner that the budget for the first fiscal year was adopted.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 400, Sec. 16.5.   Effective September 9, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

6047.94.

The district shall identify any parcel of real property with more than one acre of table grape plants that shall be subject to assessments.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 400, Sec. 18.   Effective September 9, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

6047.95.

Whenever acreage within the district is planted with table grape plants in a fashion so as to qualify as table grape acreage, the acreage is subject to assessment as provided in this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 244, Sec. 1.   Effective August 29, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

6047.96.

(a) After the district has been formed, an owner of table grape acreage in the district may present to the board a request in writing for the exclusion of that acreage or any part of the acreage from the district upon a showing that the acreage or part of the acreage will not be benefited by the activities of the district. Factors that the board may consider in its determination for exclusion, as set forth in an affidavit from the owner of the acreage, shall include those specified in Section 6047.74.

(b) After receipt of the request, the board shall cause an investigation of the parcel of acreage to be made and, if the board determines that the acreage or part of the acreage will not be benefited by the activities of the district and that exclusion of the acreage will not present a pest risk to the district, the board shall exclude the table grape acreage from the district and immediately certify this fact to the county assessor and the county auditor or tax collector.

(c) Any owner of table grape acreage outside of, or otherwise not included in, the district may present to the board a request in writing for inclusion of the acreage in the district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 400, Sec. 19.   Effective September 9, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

6047.97.

(a) The board shall, on or before the first Monday in April of each year, or as soon thereafter as possible, file with the board of supervisors a budget that sets forth all estimated expenditures of the district for the fiscal year commencing on the first day of July. A copy of the budget shall also, at the same time, be filed with the auditor of the county.

(b) The board of supervisors may, by ordinance or by resolution, adopted after notice and a hearing, determine and levy an assessment for table grape pest and disease control activities or other activities specified in subdivision (a) of Section 6047.87 related to designated pests and diseases for any of the following purposes:
